test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_C_zhiishiib_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NA - C - zhiishiib :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     zhiishiib: zhiishiib
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+zhiishiib: nizhiishiib
     2+zhiishiib: gizhiishiib
     3+zhiishiib: ozhiishiib
     X+zhiishiib: izhiishiib
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     zhiishiib+NA+Con: zhiishiibenh
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim: zhiishiibens
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     zhiishiib+NA+Pej: zhiishiibish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     zhiishiib+NA+Pret: zhiishiibiban
     zhiishiib+NA+VocPl: [zhiishiibidig, zhiishiibidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     zhiishiib+NA+Loc: zhiishiibing
     zhiishiib+NA+Obv: zhiishiiban
     zhiishiib+NA+Pl: zhiishiibag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con: nizhiishiibenh
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim: nizhiishiibens
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con: gizhiishiibenh
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim: gizhiishiibens
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con: ozhiishiibenh
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim: ozhiishiibens
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con: izhiishiibenh
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim: izhiishiibens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos: nizhiishiibim
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos: gizhiishiibim
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos: ozhiishiibim
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos: izhiishiibim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej: nizhiishiibish
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej: gizhiishiibish
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej: ozhiishiibish
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej: izhiishiibish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1Pl: nizhiishiibinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+21: gizhiishiibinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+2Pl: gizhiishiibiwaa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Obv: ozhiishiibini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Pl: ozhiishiibiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pret: nizhiishiibiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+VocPl: [nizhiishiibidig, nizhiishiibidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pret: gizhiishiibiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+VocPl: [gizhiishiibidig, gizhiishiibidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pret: ozhiishiibiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+VocPl: [ozhiishiibidig, ozhiishiibidog]
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pret: izhiishiibiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+VocPl: [izhiishiibidig, izhiishiibidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Loc: nizhiishiibing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Obv: nizhiishiiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pl: nizhiishiibag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Loc: gizhiishiibing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Obv: gizhiishiiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pl: gizhiishiibag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Loc: ozhiishiibing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Obv: ozhiishiiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pl: ozhiishiibag
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Loc: izhiishiibing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Obv: izhiishiiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pl: izhiishiibag
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej: zhiishiibenyish
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej: zhiishiibensish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pret: zhiishiibenyiban
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+VocPl: [zhiishiibenyidig, zhiishiibenyidog]
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret: zhiishiibensiban
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+VocPl: [zhiishiibensidig, zhiishiibensidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Loc: zhiishiibenying
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Obv: zhiishiibenyin
     zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pl: zhiishiibenyig
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Loc: zhiishiibensing
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Obv: zhiishiibensan
     zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pl: zhiishiibensag
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret: zhiishiibishiban
     zhiishiib+NA+Pej+VocPl: [zhiishiibishidig, zhiishiibishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Loc: zhiishiibishing
     zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Obv: zhiishiibishan
     zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pl: zhiishiibishag
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     zhiishiib+NA+Pret+Loc: zhiishiibibaniing
     zhiishiib+NA+Pret+Obv: zhiishiibibaniin
     zhiishiib+NA+Pret+Pl: zhiishiibibaniig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos: nizhiishiibenyim
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos: nizhiishiibensim
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos: gizhiishiibenyim
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos: gizhiishiibensim
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos: ozhiishiibenyim
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos: ozhiishiibensim
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pos: izhiishiibenyim
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pos: izhiishiibensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej: nizhiishiibenyish
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej: nizhiishiibensish
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej: gizhiishiibenyish
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej: gizhiishiibensish
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej: ozhiishiibenyish
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej: ozhiishiibensish
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pej: izhiishiibenyish
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pej: izhiishiibensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+1Pl: nizhiishiibenyinaan
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+1Pl: nizhiishiibensinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+21: gizhiishiibenyinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+2Pl: gizhiishiibenyiwaa
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+21: gizhiishiibensinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+2Pl: gizhiishiibensiwaa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3Obv: ozhiishiibenyini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+3Pl: ozhiishiibenyiwaa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3Obv: ozhiishiibensini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+3Pl: ozhiishiibensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pret: nizhiishiibenyiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+VocPl: [nizhiishiibenyidig, nizhiishiibenyidog]
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret: nizhiishiibensiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+VocPl: [nizhiishiibensidig, nizhiishiibensidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pret: gizhiishiibenyiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+VocPl: [gizhiishiibenyidig, gizhiishiibenyidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret: gizhiishiibensiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+VocPl: [gizhiishiibensidig, gizhiishiibensidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pret: ozhiishiibenyiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+VocPl: [ozhiishiibenyidig, ozhiishiibenyidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret: ozhiishiibensiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+VocPl: [ozhiishiibensidig, ozhiishiibensidog]
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pret: izhiishiibenyiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+VocPl: [izhiishiibenyidig, izhiishiibenyidog]
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pret: izhiishiibensiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+VocPl: [izhiishiibensidig, izhiishiibensidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Loc: nizhiishiibenying
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Obv: nizhiishiibenyin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pl: nizhiishiibenyig
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Loc: nizhiishiibensing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Obv: nizhiishiibensan
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pl: nizhiishiibensag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Loc: gizhiishiibenying
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Obv: gizhiishiibenyin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pl: gizhiishiibenyig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Loc: gizhiishiibensing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Obv: gizhiishiibensan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pl: gizhiishiibensag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Loc: ozhiishiibenying
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Obv: ozhiishiibenyin
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pl: ozhiishiibenyig
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Loc: ozhiishiibensing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Obv: ozhiishiibensan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pl: ozhiishiibensag
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Loc: izhiishiibenying
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Obv: izhiishiibenyin
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Con+Pl: izhiishiibenyig
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Loc: izhiishiibensing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Obv: izhiishiibensan
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Dim+Pl: izhiishiibensag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej: nizhiishiibimish
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej: gizhiishiibimish
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej: ozhiishiibimish
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pej: izhiishiibimish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+1Pl: nizhiishiibiminaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+21: gizhiishiibiminaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+2Pl: gizhiishiibimiwaa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Obv: ozhiishiibimini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+3Pl: ozhiishiibimiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret: nizhiishiibimiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+VocPl: [nizhiishiibimidig, nizhiishiibimidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret: gizhiishiibimiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+VocPl: [gizhiishiibimidig, gizhiishiibimidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret: ozhiishiibimiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+VocPl: [ozhiishiibimidig, ozhiishiibimidog]
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pret: izhiishiibimiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+VocPl: [izhiishiibimidig, izhiishiibimidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Loc: nizhiishiibiming
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Obv: nizhiishiibiman
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pl: nizhiishiibimag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Loc: gizhiishiibiming
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Obv: gizhiishiibiman
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pl: gizhiishiibimag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Loc: ozhiishiibiming
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Obv: ozhiishiibiman
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pl: ozhiishiibimag
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Loc: izhiishiibiming
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Obv: izhiishiibiman
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pos+Pl: izhiishiibimag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+1Pl: nizhiishiibishinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+21: gizhiishiibishinaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+2Pl: gizhiishiibishiwaa
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Obv: ozhiishiibishini
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+3Pl: ozhiishiibishiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret: nizhiishiibishiban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+VocPl: [nizhiishiibishidig, nizhiishiibishidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret: gizhiishiibishiban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+VocPl: [gizhiishiibishidig, gizhiishiibishidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret: ozhiishiibishiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+VocPl: [ozhiishiibishidig, ozhiishiibishidog]
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pret: izhiishiibishiban
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+VocPl: [izhiishiibishidig, izhiishiibishidog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Loc: nizhiishiibishing
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Obv: nizhiishiibishan
     1+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pl: nizhiishiibishag
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Loc: gizhiishiibishing
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Obv: gizhiishiibishan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pl: gizhiishiibishag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Loc: ozhiishiibishing
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Obv: ozhiishiibishan
     3+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pl: ozhiishiibishag
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Loc: izhiishiibishing
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Obv: izhiishiibishan
     X+zhiishiib+NA+Pej+Pl: izhiishiibishag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1Pl+Pret: nizhiishiibinaaniban
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1Pl+VocPl: [nizhiishiibinaanidig, nizhiishiibinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+21+Pret: gizhiishiibinaaniban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+21+VocPl: [gizhiishiibinaanidig, gizhiishiibinaanidog]
     2+zhiishiib+NA+2Pl+Pret: gizhiishiibiwaaban
     2+zhiishiib+NA+2Pl+VocPl: [gizhiishiibiwaadig, gizhiishiibiwaadog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Obv+Pret: ozhiishiibiniiban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Obv+VocPl: [ozhiishiibiniidig, ozhiishiibiniidog]
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Pl+Pret: ozhiishiibiwaaban
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Pl+VocPl: [ozhiishiibiwaadig, ozhiishiibiwaadog]
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1Pl+Loc: nizhiishiibinaaning
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1Pl+Obv: nizhiishiibinaanin
     1+zhiishiib+NA+1Pl+Pl: nizhiishiibinaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+21+Loc: gizhiishiibinaaning
     2+zhiishiib+NA+21+Obv: gizhiishiibinaanin
     2+zhiishiib+NA+21+Pl: gizhiishiibinaanig
     2+zhiishiib+NA+2Pl+Loc: gizhiishiibiwaang
     2+zhiishiib+NA+2Pl+Obv: gizhiishiibiwaan
     2+zhiishiib+NA+2Pl+Pl: gizhiishiibiwaag
     3+zhiishiib+NA+3Obv+Loc: ozhiishiibiniing
